Washington statutes.
RCW 24.06.465

Penalties imposed upon corporation—Penalty established by secretary of state.

(1) Each corporation, domestic or foreign, which fails or refuses to file its annual report for any year within the time prescribed by this chapter shall be subject to a penalty as established and assessed by the secretary of state.

(2) Each corporation, domestic or foreign, which fails or refuses to answer truthfully and fully within the time prescribed by this chapter any interrogatories propounded by the secretary of state in accordance with the provisions of this chapter, is guilty of a misdemeanor and upon conviction thereof shall be fined in an amount not to exceed five hundred dollars on each count.

[ 2003 c 53 s 165; 1994 c 287 s 11; 1969 ex.s. c 120 s 93.]

NOTES:

Intent—Effective date—2003 c 53: See notes following RCW 2.48.180.